Utah statutes.
70A-3-415.   Obligation of indorser.
(1)  Subject to Subsections (2), (3), and (4) and to Subsection 70A-3-419 (4),
if an instrument is dishonored, an indorser is obliged to pay the amount due
on the instrument according to the terms of the instrument at the time it was
indorsed, or if the indorser indorsed an incomplete instrument, according to
its terms when completed, to the extent stated in Sections 70A-3-115 and
70A-3-407.  The obligation of the indorser is owed to a person entitled to
enforce the instrument or to a subsequent indorser who paid the instrument
under this section.
(2)  If an indorsement states that it is made "without recourse" or otherwise
disclaims liability of the indorser, the indorser is not liable under
Subsection (1) to pay the instrument.
(3)  If notice of dishonor of an instrument is required by Section 70A-3-503
and notice of dishonor complying with that section is not given to an
indorser, the liability of the indorser under Subsection (1) is discharged.
(4)  If a draft is accepted by a bank after an indorsement is made, the
liability of the indorser under Subsection (1) is discharged.
(5)  If an indorser of a check is liable under Subsection (1) and the check is
not presented for payment, or given to a depositary bank for collection,
within 30 days after the day the indorsement was made, the liability of the
indorser under Subsection (1) is discharged.
